Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.115

Materials from a federal agency or other state's attorney general.

Whenever the attorney general receives documents or other material from:

(1) A federal agency, pursuant to its subpoena or Hart-Scott-Rodino authority; or

(2) Another state's attorney general, pursuant to that state's presuit investigative subpoena powers,

the documents or materials are subject to the same restrictions as and may be used for all the purposes set forth in RCW 19.86.110.

[ 1993 c 125 s 2.]